Nebraska, session 109, LB354.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB354 LB354
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-27,139.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is amended to read:
77-27,139.03 (1) State aid provided to municipalities pursuant to
sections 77-27,139.01 to 77-27,139.04 shall be calculated by determining
the average property tax levy for operational purposes other than for
principal and interest payments on the indebtedness of all incorporated
municipalities. The Auditor of Public Accounts shall provide to the
Department of Revenue a list of the bond and nonbond tax request amounts
from the most recent budgets filed by incorporated municipalities. The
information shall be used to calculate the bond and nonbond tax levies
for aid purposes under this section. The auditor shall provide the
information to the department by February 1 each year.
(2) Each municipality shall receive state aid from the Municipal
Equalization Fund equal to (a) the product of the average per capita
property tax of the appropriate population group multiplied by the
current population of the municipality minus (b) the product of the
average property tax levy multiplied by the certified valuation within
the incorporated municipality, except that a municipality shall not
receive any aid under this section if the calculation results in a
negative number or if such municipality is a city of the first class.
(3) If a municipal tax levy for operational purposes was less than
the average property tax levy in the immediately preceding fiscal year,
the state aid provided to such municipality shall be reduced by twenty
percent for each one-cent increment the levy was below the average
property tax levy but the reduction shall not exceed eighty percent.
(4) If the amount of money in the Municipal Equalization Fund is
less than the total amount of state aid for all municipalities as
required by the allocation formula in subsection (2) of this section, the
money in the fund shall be allocated on a prorated basis to such
municipalities. If the amount of money in the fund is more than the total
amount of state aid for municipalities as required by the allocation
-2-

LB354 LB354
2025 2025
formula, the excess money in the fund shall be credited to the General
Fund.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-27,139.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-